test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-12pronsg_mie_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mie - ei tsekattu : # Pronoun 'eg'
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: mie
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: [minun, mun]
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Par: minnuu
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ess: minuna
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Tra: minuksi
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ine: minussa
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela: minusta
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: minhuun
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ade: [minula, mulla]
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl: [minulta, multa]
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+All: [minule, mulle]
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abe: minutta

     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: sie
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen: [sinun, sun]
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Par: sinnuu
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ess: sinuna
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Tra: sinuksi
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ine: sinussa
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ela: sinusta
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ill: sinhuun
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ade: [sinula, sulla]
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl: [sinulta, sulta]
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+All: [sinule, sulle]
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abe: sinutta

     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: hän
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: hänen
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Par: häntä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ess: hänenä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Tra: häneksi
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine: hänessä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: hänestä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: hänheen
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ade: hänelä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: häneltä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+All: hänele
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abe: hänettä

     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: se
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: sen
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Par: sitä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ess: sinä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Tra: siksi
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine: siinä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: siitä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: siiheen
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ade: sillä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: siltä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg3+All: sille

     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: met
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen: meiđän
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: meiđät
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Par: meitä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ess: meinä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Tra: meiksi
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ine: meissä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ela: meistä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: meihiin
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ade: meilä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abl: meiltä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+All: meile
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abe: meittä

     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: tet
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen: teiđän
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: teiđät
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Par: teitä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ess: teinä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Tra: teiksi
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ine: teissä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ela: teistä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ill: teihiin
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ade: teilä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abl: teiltä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+All: teile
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abe: teittä

     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: het
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: heiđän
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: heiđät
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Par: heitä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ess: heinä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Tra: heiksi
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine: heissä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: heistä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill: heihiin
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ade: heilä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Abl: heiltä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+All: heile
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Abe: heittä

     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: net
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: niitten
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: net
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Par: niitä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ess: niinä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Tra: niiksi
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine: niissä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: niistä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill: niihiin
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ade: niilä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Abl: niiltä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+All: niile
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Abe: niittä
